Montana, session 2025, SB170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 5, Chapter 412, Laws of 2019, is amended to read:
"Section 5. Direction to department of public health and human services. The department of
public health and human services is directed to apply to the centers for medicare and medicaid services for a
state plan amendment or a research and demonstration project waiver as may be needed to authorize medicaid
coverage of services provided by individuals certified in accordance with [section 2]."
Section 2. Repealer. Section 7, Chapter 412, Laws of 2019, and section 1, Chapter 298, Laws of
2023, are repealed.
Section 3. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a copy of [this act]
to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 170
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 170, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 170
INTRODUCED BY J. WINDY BOY, C.NEUMANN
AN ACT ELIMINATING THE TERMINATION DATE OF THE COMMUNITY HEALTH AIDE PROGRAM;
AMENDING SECTION 5, CHAPTER 412, LAWS OF 2019; REPEALING SECTION 7, CHAPTER 412, LAWS OF
2019, AND SECTION 1, CHAPTER 298, LAWS OF 2023; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE
DATE.”